Alaska, session 34, HB279.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 07 * Section 1. AS 14.30.125 is amended to read: 08 Sec. 14.30.125. Immunization. If, in the judgment of the commissioner of 09 health, it is necessary for the welfare of the children or the general public in an area, 10 the governing body of the school district shall require the children attending school in 11 that area to be immunized against the diseases the commissioner of health may 12 specify. The governing body may require a child to be immunized only with a 13 vaccine that has received full approval by the United States Food and Drug 01 Administration. 02 * Sec. 2. AS 14.30 is amended by adding a new section to read: 03 Sec. 14.30.367. Immunizations required to participate in interscholastic 04 activities. An association that administers and promotes interscholastic activities in 05 the state may, in order to participate in an interscholastic activity, require a youth to be 06 immunized only with a vaccine that has received full approval by the United States 07 Food and Drug Administration. In this section, "interscholastic activity" has the 08 meaning given to "interscholastic activities" in AS 14.30.365(c). 09 * Sec. 3. AS 14.40 is amended by adding a new section to read: 10 Sec. 14.40.053. Immunizations required by the University. The University 11 of Alaska may require a student to be immunized only with a vaccine that has received 12 full approval by the United States Food and Drug Administration. 13 * Sec. 4. AS 18.05 is amended by adding a new section to read: 14 Sec. 18.05.067. Vaccine information. Before administering a vaccine to a 15 child under 18 years of age, a health care provider shall provide to the child's parent or 16 legal guardian a copy of the statement produced by the United States Centers for 17 Disease Control and Prevention that describes the risks and benefits of the vaccine or, 18 if the vaccine is authorized for use because of a public health emergency, a copy of the 19 vaccine's emergency use authorization fact sheet produced by the United States Food 20 and Drug Administration. In this section, "vaccine" has the meaning given in 21 AS 18.09.990. 22 * Sec. 5. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.